Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-362
Sewerage and drainage; connections; permit required; assessment of cost; conditions.

The city shall require the issuance of a permit to connect with any sewer on any street, alley or private property within the corporate limits or within three miles thereof, and shall require the sewer assessment on the abutting property to be paid before such permit is issued; Provided, that if such assessment is being paid in installments as by law provided, the city shall require delinquent and current installments to be paid before such permit is issued. In case the cost of the sewer has not been assessed, or such assessment has been declared invalid by any court of competent jurisdiction, the city shall require the payment of the pro rata share of the cost of such sewer before such permit is issued.

Laws 1921, c. 116, art. III, § 53, p. 455;

C.S.1922, § 3605;

C.S.1929, § 14-354;

R.S.1943, § 14-362;

Laws 1959, c. 31, § 1, p. 186.